Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1053
Service supplier, defined.

Service supplier means any person providing 911 service in this state.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 233;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-432;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 35.